Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 4. Investigations and Disciplinary Proceedings

§ 33-26-401.
Board duties; investigation; interview.

The board shall investigate, upon a written and signed complaint or by its own motion, any information that if proven would fall within the jurisdiction of the board and would constitute a violation of this act.

Before holding a contested case hearing, the board shall conduct an informal interview with the licensee unless the licensee waives an interview.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law the board may require, by administrative subpoena, the testimony of licensees and witnesses and the production of evidence relating to any matter under investigation.

All evidence admitted into the record of any contested case hearing held before the board shall be subject to the confidentiality provisions set forth in W.S.

33-26-408

unless waived by the licensee.

The board retains jurisdiction over only those licensees to whom temporary or full licenses were granted and who are subject to ongoing investigation by the board, regardless of whether the license expired, lapsed or was relinquished during or after the alleged occurrence of conduct proscribed by W.S.

33-26-402

by the licensee.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-340.4; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-130; Laws 1981, ch. 78, § 1; 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of this act, referred to in this section, see § 33-26-102(a)(xxi).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mandamus to compel disciplinary investigation or action against physician or attorney, 33 ALR3d 1429.

Rights as to notice and hearing in proceeding to revoke or suspend license to practice medicine, 10 ALR5th 1.

§ 33-26-402.
Grounds for suspension; revocation; restriction; imposition of conditions; refusal to renew or other disciplinary action.

The board may refuse to renew, and may revoke, suspend or restrict a license or take other disciplinary action, including the imposition of conditions or restrictions upon a license on one (1) or more of the following grounds:

Renewing, obtaining or attempting to obtain or renew a license by bribery, fraud or misrepresentation;

Impersonating another licensee or practicing medicine under a false or assumed name;

Making false or misleading statements regarding the licensee’s skill or the efficacy or value of his treatment or remedy for a human disease, injury, deformity, ailment, pregnancy or delivery of infants;

Permitting or allowing any person to use his diploma, license or certificate of registration;

Advertising the practice of medicine in a misleading, false or deceptive manner;

Obtaining any fee or claim for payment of a fee by fraud or misrepresentation;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 80, § 3.

Conviction of or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or any crime that is a felony under Wyoming law in any jurisdiction;

Aiding or abetting the practice of medicine by a person not licensed by the board;

Violating or attempting to violate or assist in the violation of any provision of this chapter or any other applicable provision of law;

Except as permitted by law, repeatedly prescribing or administering, selling or supplying any drug legally classified as a narcotic, addicting or scheduled drug to a known abuser;

Repeatedly prescribing, selling, supplying or administering any drug legally classified as a narcotic, addicting or scheduled drug to a parent, spouse or child of the applicant or licensee, or to himself;

Presigning blank prescription forms;

Failing or refusing to properly guard against the spread of contagious, infectious or communicable diseases;

Failure to appropriately supervise nonphysicians to whom the licensee has delegated medical responsibilities;

Delegating responsibilities to a person who is not qualified by training, experience or licensure;

Delegating medical responsibilities to a person who is unable to safely, skillfully and competently provide medical care to patients or that are beyond the scope of the specialty areas in which the licensee and the person are trained and experienced;

Willful and consistent utilization of medical service or treatment which is inappropriate or unnecessary;

A manifest incapacity to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients;

Possession of any physical or mental disability including deterioration due to aging which renders the practice of medicine unsafe;

Use of a drug or intoxicant to such a degree as to render the licensee unable to practice medicine or surgery with reasonable skill and safety to patients;

Practicing medicine below the applicable standard of care, regardless of causation or damage;

Failure to submit to an informal interview or a mental, physical or medical competency examination following a proper request by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-26-403

;

Failure to report a personal injury claim as required by W.S.

33-26-409

;

Suspension, probation, imposition of conditions or restrictions, relinquishment, surrender or revocation of a license to practice medicine in another jurisdiction;

Any action by a health care entity that:

Adversely affects clinical privileges for a period of thirty (30) or more consecutive days;

Results in the surrender of clinical privileges to the health care entity while the licensee is under investigation by the health care entity for possible professional incompetence or improper professional conduct; or

Results in the surrender of clinical privileges in return for the health care entity not conducting an investigation for possible professional incompetence or improper professional conduct.

Unprofessional or dishonorable conduct not otherwise specified in this subsection, including but not limited to:

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Failure to conform to the applicable standard of care;

Willful or careless disregard for the health, welfare or safety of a patient;

Engaging in any conduct or practice that is harmful or dangerous to the health of a patient or the public;

Engaging in conduct intended to or likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public;

Using any false, fraudulent or deceptive statement in any document connected with the practice of medicine including the intentional falsification or fraudulent alteration of a patient or health care facility record;

Failing to prepare and maintain legible and complete written medical records that accurately describe the medical services rendered to the patient, including the patient’s history, pertinent findings, examination, results, test results and all treatment provided;

Practicing outside of the scope of the licensee’s expertise and training;

Repeatedly engaging in harassing, disruptive or abusive behavior directed at staff, co-workers, a patient or a patient’s relative or guardian or that interferes with the provision of patient care;

Engaging in conduct that relates adversely to the practice of medicine or to the ability to practice medicine, including but not limited to conviction of or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to domestic abuse, stalking, sexual assault, sexual abuse or unlawful exploitation of a minor, indecent exposure, incest or distribution of pornography;

Failing or neglecting to attempt to inform a patient within a reasonable time of the results of a laboratory test indicating the need for further clinical review;

Improperly terminating a physician-patient relationship;

Representing that a manifestly incurable disease or condition can be permanently cured or that any disease or condition can be cured by a secret method, procedure, treatment, medicine or device if the representation is untrue;

Intentionally or negligently releasing or disclosing confidential patient information. This restriction shall not apply to disclosures permitted or required by state or federal law or when disclosure is necessary to prevent imminent risk of harm to the patient or others;

Failing or refusing to transfer a copy of patient records to the patient or the patient’s legally designated representative within thirty (30) days after receipt of a written request;

Utilization of experimental forms of therapy without proper informed consent from the patient, without conforming to generally-accepted criteria or standard protocols, without keeping detailed, legible records or without having periodic analysis of the study and results reviewed by a committee of peers;

Except in emergency situations where the consent of the patient or the patient’s legally designated representative cannot be reasonably obtained, assisting in the care or treatment of a patient without the consent of the patient, the attending physician or the patient’s legal representative;

Using or engaging in fraud or deceit to obtain third party reimbursement.

Upon proper request by the board, failure or refusal to produce documents or other information relevant to any investigation conducted by the board, whether the complaint is filed against the licensee or any other licensee;

and (xxx) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Violation of any board rule or regulation;

Acquiring or attempting or conspiring to acquire any drug classified as a narcotic, addicting or scheduled drug by fraud or deception;

Initially prescribing any controlled substance specified in W.S.

35-7-1016

through

35-7-1022

for any person through the Internet, the World Wide Web or a similar proprietary or common carrier electronic system absent a documented physician-patient relationship;

Violating any final order, consent decree or stipulation between the board and the licensee;

Any behavior by a licensee toward a patient, former patient, another licensee, an employee of a health care facility, an employee of the licensee or a relative or guardian of a patient that exploits the position of trust, knowledge, emotions or influence of the licensee.

Upon a finding of ineligibility for licensure or refusal to grant a license under subsection (a) of this section, the board shall file its written order and findings.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-340.3; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-129; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 201, § 1; 2018 ch. 80, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2009 amendment,

inserted “relinquishment, surrender” in (a)(xxv); substituted “period of thirty (30) or more consecutive days” for “period exceeding thirty (30) days” at the end of (a)(xxvi)(A); and substituted “disclosures permitted or required” for “disclosures required” in (a)(xxvii)(P).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 80, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(xxxv); and made a related stylistic change.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 80, § 3, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (a)(vii), which read: “Sexual misconduct.”

The third 2018 amendment, by ch. 107, §
2, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(xxvii)(K), substituted “relates adversely to the practice of medicine or to the ability to practice medicine” for “constitutes moral turpitude” following “conduct that.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(xxvii)(I) or (L) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Recovery for malpractice. —

To recover for malpractice, a plaintiff must show that the physician or surgeon was unskillful or negligent, and that his lack of skill or care caused injury to the plaintiff. Rosson v. Hylton, 45 Wyo. 540, 22 P.2d 195,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1933).

Expert testimony not required. —

Nature of the violation and the facts underlying it are within the Wyoming Board of Medicine and the court’s knowledge, and thus petitioner was not required to present expert testimony to prove the doctor exploited her professional relationship with the patient. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

Exploit defined. —

Wyoming Medical Practice Act prohibits any behavior toward a patient that exploits the position of trust, knowledge, emotions or influence of the licensee; the court adopts the ordinary definition of the verb exploit: to make use of meanly or unfairly for one’s own advantage. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

Violation of this section shown. —

There was clear and convincing evidence that the physician's conduct exhibited willful and consistent utilization of medical services that were inappropriate and unnecessary, in violation of this section. Kirbens v. Wyoming State Bd. of Med., 992 P.2d 1056,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1999).

Findings of fact made by the Wyoming Board of Medicine supported its conclusion that the doctor exploited her professional relationship with the patient under the plain meaning of the term; but for the doctor’s licensure as a physician, she would not have had access to the patient, nor would she have been able to command the trust and reliance that allowed her to exert control over the patient, her finances, and her ranch. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

Wyoming Board of Medicine properly concluded that the doctor violated the statute, as she did not follow the steps required by to terminate the physician-patient relationship, and expert testimony was not required to determine whether the doctor adequately notified her patient of the termination. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

Quoted

in

Painter v. Abels, 998 P.2d 931,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Garrison v. Board of Trustees, 795 P.2d 190,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 81

, 28 A.L.R.5th 801 (Wyo. 1990); Devous v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Exmrs., 845 P.2d 408,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1993); In re Licensure of Jerry Penny v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Mental Health Professions Licensing Bd., 2005 WY 117, 120 P.3d 152,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancelation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Alcoholism, narcotics addiction or misconduct with respect to alcohol or narcotics as ground for revocation or suspension of license to practice medicine, 93 ALR2d 1398.

Revocation or suspension of physician's or surgeon's license for false claims, medical reports or bills for medical services in connection with personal injury litigation, 95 ALR2d 873.

Improper or immoral conduct toward female patient as ground for disciplinary measure against physician or dentist, 15 ALR3d 1179.

Professional incompetency as ground for disciplinary measure against physician or dentist, 28 ALR3d 487.

Criminal prosecution or disciplinary action against medical practitioner for fraud in connection with claims for services provided under medicaid, medicare or similar welfare program, 50 ALR3d 549.

Wrongful or excessive prescription of drugs as ground for revocation or suspension of physician's or dentist's license to practice, 22 ALR4th 668.

Imposition of civil penalties, under state statute, upon medical practitioner for fraud in connection with claims under medicaid, medicare, or similar welfare programs for providing medical services, 32 ALR4th 671.

Physician's or other healer's conduct, or conviction of offense, not directly related to medical practice, as ground for disciplinary action, 34 ALR4th 609.

Recovery for emotional distress resulting from statement of medical practitioner or official, allegedly constituting outrageous conduct, 34 ALR4th 688.

Medical malpractice: liability based on misrepresentation of the nature and hazards of treatment, 42 ALR4th 543.

Physician's liability to third person for prescribing drug to known drug addict, 42 ALR4th 586.

Physician's or other healer's conduct in connection with defense of or resistance of malpractice action as ground for revocation of license or other disciplinary action, 44 ALR4th 248.

Filing of false insurance claims for medical services as ground for disciplinary action against dentist, physician or other medical practitioner, 70 ALR4th 132.

Liability for incorrectly diagnosing existence or nature of pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 769.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to child caused by improper postdelivery diagnosis, care, and representations, 2 ALR5th 811.

False or fraudulent statements or nondisclosures in application for issuance or renewal of license to practice as ground for disciplinary action against, or refusal to license, medical practitioner, 32 ALR5th 57.

Physical injury requirement for emotional distress claim based on false positive conclusion on medical test diagnosing disease, 69 ALR5th 411.

Wrongful or excessive prescription of drugs as ground for revocation or suspension of physician's or dentist's license to practice. 19 A.L.R.6th 577.

§ 33-26-403.
Impaired physicians.

The board may order a licensee to undergo one (1) or more mental, physical or medical competency examinations by examiners deemed appropriate by the board if it has reasonable cause to believe that the licensee may be impaired. If a disciplinary proceeding is pending against the licensee at the time of the order, the proceeding shall be stayed until the results of the examination have been finalized and submitted to the board.

Every licensee is deemed to have consented to and shall submit to a board ordered mental, physical, or medical competency examination and to have waived all objections to the production of the report of the examination to the board and the admissibility of the report of the examination in any board proceedings in which the licensee is or may become a respondent. If a licensee fails to submit to an examination when ordered by the board, the board may initiate a disciplinary proceeding against the licensee or amend a pending complaint to include a claim based upon a violation of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 58, § 2.

The licensee may submit additional information to the board, including but not limited to medical reports, consultations or laboratory reports obtained through an examination performed by a practitioner designated by the licensee.

The results of any board ordered mental, physical competency or medical competency examination shall be provided to the licensee and the board prior to any further board action.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 33-340.5, 33-340.6, 33-340.8; W.S. 1977, §§ 33-26-131, 33-26-132, 33-26-134; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2006, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), in the first sentence, deleted “competency” following “physical,” inserted “by examiners deemed appropriate by the board,” substituted “If a disciplinary proceeding is pending against the licensee at the time of the order, the proceeding” for “Any disciplinary proceeding pending against the licensee at the time of the order, the proceeding” in the second sentence; in (b), substituted “ordered” for “requested” in two places, inserted “or may become,” inserted “or amend a pending complaint to include a claim”; repealed former (c) which pertained to reasonable cause by the board to conduct competency examination of licensee; substituted “obtained through an examination performed by a practitioner designated by the licensee” for “The licensee may also designate another physician to be present at the examination and make an independent report to the board” in (d); and made related changes.

Due process. —

The board's failure to provide the physician notice of the right to designate an independent physician, coupled with the short time frame between delivery of the notice and date of the examination, effectively precluded her from exercising the right to provide independent analysis. Painter v. Abels, 998 P.2d 931,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 33-26-404.
Voluntary and mandatory revocation; restriction; suspension.

A licensee may request the board, in writing, to accept the voluntary relinquishment, restriction or suspension of his license. The board may, but shall not be required to accept the relinquished license, grant the request for restriction or suspension, attach conditions to the license or waive the commencement of any proceedings under this article. Removal of a voluntary relinquishment, restriction or suspension is subject to the procedure for reinstatement of a license as provided in this article.

Unless the board and the licensee have agreed to the relinquishment of or imposition of restrictions or conditions on a license, the board shall conduct a proceeding to refuse to renew or reinstate, revoke, restrict or suspend a license on the grounds set forth in W.S. 33-26-402(a) as a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The board may temporarily suspend the license of any licensee without a hearing pursuant to W.S. 16-3-113(c).

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 33-340.7, 33-340.9; W.S. 1977, §§ 33-26-133, 33-26-135; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2003, ch. 190, § 2.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conduct defined. —

Wyoming Board of Medicine conducted a six-day contested case hearing in front of an independent hearing examiner, both parties participated in pre-hearing motion practice, presented evidence, conducted direct and cross-examination of witnesses, and submitted the case to the Board; this satisfied the statutory requirement that the Board “conduct” the contested case proceeding. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

Board not required to accept voluntary relinquishment of license. —

The Wyoming board of medicine was not required to accept the voluntary relinquishment of the physician's license where the physician was the subject of a pending disciplinary proceeding. Kirbens v. Wyoming State Bd. of Med., 992 P.2d 1056,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 33-26-405.
Order of the board.

Following a hearing to refuse to renew or reinstate, revoke, restrict or suspend a license on the grounds set forth in W.S. 33-26-402(a), the board shall enter its order and findings pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The board may take one (1) or more of the following actions:

Dismiss the proceedings;

Issue a public or private reprimand;

Order probation and provide terms;

Impose a civil fine not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00);

Suspend the license;

Revoke the license;

Place restrictions on the license;

Assess part or all of the cost of the proceeding against a disciplined licensee;

Take other action as the board in its discretion finds proper;

Place the licensee on probation.

Restriction of a license may include, but is not limited to, the following:

Restricting the practice to certain areas of medicine or forbidding the practice of certain areas of medicine;

Requiring the licensee to practice medicine under the supervision of another physician in a clinic or other controlled setting, and setting the conditions of the licensee’s practice of medicine;

Forbidding the use of certain medical procedures without consultation with and approval by another physician.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-340.10; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-136; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

added “, and setting the conditions of the licensee's practice of medicine” at the end of (b)(ii).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi) and notes thereto.

Hearsay admissible. —

Hearsay that is otherwise admissible under § 16-3-108(a), and that is probative, trustworthy and credible may be received in evidence at an agency hearing. Story v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Examiners, 721 P.2d 1013,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1986).

Licensee denied fair and impartial hearing. —

The submission to the board by the state medical society of an unsworn report of the medical society's grievance committee, which report was replete with hearsay, speculation and conjecture, and contained damaging information extraneous to the matters to be heard, resulted in the denial to the licensee of the fair and impartial hearing to which he was entitled. Fallon v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Examiners, 441 P.2d 322,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 443 P.2d 135,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1968).

Hearing examiner costs like attorney fees. —

Because the expenses of the hearing examiner are to be treated like attorney fees, they were properly not imposed against a vindicated licensee. Devous v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Examiners, 845 P.2d 408,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1993).

Prosecuting attorney and officer fees may not be assessed. —

Without statutory authority to the contrary, the Wyoming Board of Medicine is bound by case law and may not assess its prosecuting attorney and Office of Administrative Hearings officer fees against the doctor. Painter v. Hallingbye, 2021 WY 78, 489 P.3d 684,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2021).

Cost of proceeding. —

Subdivision (a)(viii), allowing assessment of “part or all of the cost of the proceeding against a disciplined licensee,” does not include the costs and expenses of the hearing officer. Painter v. Abels, 998 P.2d 931,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Determination by board on its own knowledge, without expert evidence, in proceeding for revocation of license, 6 ALR2d 675.

Statute of limitations or doctrine of laches as applicable to proceeding to revoke license to practice medicine, 63 ALR2d 1080.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Pretrial discovery in disciplinary proceedings against physician, 28 ALR3d 1440.

Comment note on hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

Entrapment as a defense in proceedings to revoke or suspend license to practice medicine, 61 ALR3d 357.

Applicability of statute of limitations or doctrine of laches to proceeding to revoke or suspend license to practice medicine, 51 ALR4th 1147.

Necessity of expert evidence in proceeding for revocation or suspension of license of physician, surgeon or dentist, 74 ALR4th 969.

§ 33-26-406.
Reinstatement of license; removal of restrictions or conditions from a license.

A person whose license has been voluntarily relinquished, revoked, restricted or suspended, or had conditions or restrictions placed upon his license, voluntarily or by action of the board, may petition for reinstatement of his license or for removal of any restrictions or conditions placed upon his license pursuant to W.S.

33-26-405

not less than six (6) months after final judicial review of a board order accepting relinquishment of, or revoking, restricting, placing conditions upon or suspending the petitioner’s license or six (6) months after the date of the board order if there is no judicial review.

The petitioner shall submit a petition in writing to the board that, at a minimum, sets forth and provides information regarding the petitioner’s fulfillment of any and all conditions or compliance with all restrictions imposed upon petitioner by any prior order of the board or success in correcting the conduct that formed the basis for revocation or relinquishment of petitioner’s license.

Upon receipt of the petition, the board shall set the matter for hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The burden of proof upon the petitioner at the hearing shall be to demonstrate, by a preponderance of evidence, that:

Petitioner has corrected the conduct that formed the basis for the revocation or relinquishment of petitioner’s license and that petitioner is able to safely, skillfully and competently resume the practice of medicine; or

Petitioner has fulfilled all conditions or complied with all restrictions imposed upon petitioner by any prior order of the board, has otherwise corrected the conduct or condition which formed the basis for the restrictions or conditions placed on petitioner’s license and is able to safely, skillfully and competently practice medicine in this state.

After a hearing conducted pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the board shall issue specific findings of facts, conclusions of law and a final order:

Reinstating the license;

Reinstating the license subject to restrictions or conditions;

Removing or modifying the restrictions or conditions of the license; or

Denying reinstatement of the license or removal of the restrictions or conditions on the license.

Any final order issued by the board hereunder shall be subject to judicial review as provided for by W.S.

33-26-407

.

If the board denies a reinstatement or removal of restrictions or conditions, future petitions for reinstatement or removal of restrictions or conditions may be submitted not less than one (1) year after the board’s final order denying reinstatement or removal of restrictions or conditions.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (d) of this section, if a license is suspended under W.S. 33-26-404(d), the license may be reissued without a hearing as provided in this section upon receipt from the department of family services of notice that the applicant has complied with the terms of the court order that resulted in the suspension or restriction of the license under W.S. 33-26-404(d).

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-340.11; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-137; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2003, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

in (a),
susbstituted “has been voluntarily relinquished, revoked, restricted or suspended, or had conditions or restrictions placed upon his license”
for “has been revoked, restricted or suspended under this chapter” near the beginning and substituted “board order accepting relinquishment of, or revoking, restricting, placing conditions upon” for “board order revoking, restricting” near the end; and inserted “or relinquishment” in (b) and (c)(i).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi) and notes thereto.

§ 33-26-407.
Judicial review.

Judicial review of the findings of the board may be obtained pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. All final administrative orders of the board shall remain effective pending any judicial review, except where the board finds that the licensee’s continued practice presents no danger to the public.

In any disciplinary proceeding against a licensee, the board shall bear the burden of proving a violation of this act by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-340.12; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-138; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action generally, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P., and Rule 87(b), W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-26-102(a)(xxi).

Subsection (b) unconstitutional. —

In disciplinary proceedings, the board must prove disciplinary cases by clear and convincing evidence; therefore, subsection (b) of this section is unconstitutional on both equal protection and due process grounds. Painter v. Abels, 998 P.2d 931,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2000).

It is presumed that board action was right. —

The presumption is that members of the board are assumed to be men of conscience and intellectual discipline, capable of judging a particular controversy fairly on the basis of its own circumstances. It is also presumed the action of the board was right. The burden is on the challenging party to overcome the presumptions. Fallon v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Examiners, 441 P.2d 322,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 443 P.2d 135,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1968).

But requisite basic findings are not implied from ultimate findings. —

Where a limited right of review such as prevails in this state is granted from the decision of an administrative agency, such agency must find the basic facts upon which its decision rests. Unlike the rule observed in a proceeding tried in the district courts of this state, the requisite basic findings will not be implied from ultimate findings. Fallon v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Examiners, 441 P.2d 322,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 443 P.2d 135,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1968).

Applied

in

Taylor v. Wyoming Bd. of Medicine, 930 P.2d 973,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

See “Scope of Review of Decision of an Administrative Agency in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 65 (1954).

See note, “De Novo Judicial Review of Wyoming Administrative Findings,” 15 Wyo. L.J. 67 (1960).